Arkansas, session 2025, HB1240.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 21-5-407, concerning definitions used under
the State and Public School Life and Health Insurance Program, is amended to
add an additional subdivision to read as follows:
(21)(A) "Fire department" means an organization that:
(i) Is established for the prevention or
extinguishment of fires; and
(ii) Employs a volunteer fire fighter.
(B) "Fire department" includes a firefighting unit; and
(22) "Volunteer firefighter" means a member of a fire department
who:
(A) Actively engages in fire suppression, rescue, pump
operation, or other firefighting activity; and
(B) Receives less than five thousand dollars ($5,000) in
total compensation during the taxable year from the volunteer fire department
*ANS015*
01/27/2025 12:18:18 PM ANS015

HB1240
that the volunteer firefighter serves.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 21-5-410(g)(1), concerning eligibility to
participate in the State and Public School Life and Health Insurance Program,
is amended to read as follows:
(g)(1) The following persons are eligible to participate in the
program:
(A) A public school employee who is in a position that
requires on average at least thirty (30) hours per week of actual performance
of duty during the annual school year; and
(B) A full-time school bus driver who is employed by a
public school district to drive regular routes during the annual school year;
and
(C)(i) A volunteer firefighter.
(ii) A volunteer firefighter who elects to
participate in the program is responsible to pay a premium as determined by
the State Board of Finance or the cost of the policy issued to the volunteer
firefighter.
(iii) The volunteer firefighter portion of the
premium may be:
(a) Deducted from a bank account of the
volunteer firefighter to be paid by a monthly bank draft on the date
designated by the Employee Benefits Division; or
(b) Paid in full or partially by the fire
department that employs the volunteer firefighter directly to the division on
the date designated by the division.










01/27/2025 12:18:18 PM ANS015